Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,176
Undercover plates; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who receives information pertaining to undercover license plates in the course of his or her employment and who discloses any such information to any unauthorized individual shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 176.